Tennessee, session 114, SB0688.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-5-415, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The chair of the state board of education, or the chair's designee, may issue
subpoenas for the appearance of persons or the production of items, including, but not
limited to, documents; videos; and audio recordings, that the chair, or the chair's
designee, considers material or relevant to:
(1) An investigation being conducted by the state board, within or outside
of this state, pursuant to the state board's authority to revoke, suspend, refuse to
issue, or renew a license or formally reprimand a licensed educator; or
(2) An accountability hearing being conducted by the state board in
accordance with § 49-3-112(c) for a local education agency operating a public
school, or a public charter school, receiving a "D" or "F" letter grade.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0688
001963
- 1 -